California statutes. Water Code
(b) The board may enter into contracts with local public agencies having authority to construct, operate, and maintain water reclamation projects, for loans to aid in the design and construction of eligible water reclamation projects. The board may loan up to 100 percent of the total eligible cost of design and construction of an eligible reclamation project.

(c) Any contract for an eligible water reclamation project entered into pursuant to this section may include such provisions as determined by the board and shall include both of the following provisions:

(1) An estimate of the reasonable cost of the eligible water reclamation project.

(2) An agreement by the local public agency to proceed expeditiously with, and complete, the eligible water reclamation project; commence operation of the project in accordance with applicable provisions of law, and provide for the payment of the local public agency’s share of the cost of the project, including principal and interest on any state loan made pursuant to this section.

(d) Loan contracts may not provide for a moratorium on payments of principal or interest.

(e) Any loans made from the fund may be for a period of up to 20 years. The interest rate for the loans shall be set at a rate equal to 50 percent of the interest rate paid by the state on the most recent sale of state general obligation bonds, with that rate to be computed according to the true interest cost method. When the interest rate so determined is not a multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent, the interest rate shall be set at the next higher multiple of one-tenth of 1 percent.

(f) All money repaid to the state pursuant to any contract executed under this chapter shall be deposited in the Water Recycling Subaccount in the Clean Water and Water Recycling Account in the Safe Drinking Water, Clean Water, Watershed Protection, and Flood Protection Bond Fund created by Section 79136, for the purposes set forth in Article 4 (commencing with Section 79135) of Chapter 7 of Division 26.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 725, Sec. 3.   Amendment approved in Proposition 13 at the March 7, 2000, election.   Note: This section was added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, and approved in Prop. 83 on Nov. 8, 1988.)
-------------------------------------------

14059.

As approved by the Legislature annually in the Budget Act, the board may expend for the administration of this chapter not more than 5 percent of the amount of the bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14060.

As approved by the Legislature annually in the Budget Act, the board may, by contract or otherwise, undertake plans, surveys, research, development, and studies necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the purposes of this division, and may prepare recommendations with regard thereto, including the preparation of comprehensive statewide or areawide studies and reports on water reclamation and the collection, treatment, and disposal of waste under a comprehensive cooperative plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14061.

The board may adopt rules, regulations, and guidelines necessary or appropriate to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Fiscal Provisions [14065. - 14076.]

14065.

Bonds in the total amount of sixty-five million dollars ($65,000,000), exclusive of refunding bonds, or so much thereof as is necessary, may be issued and sold to provide a fund to be used for carrying out the purposes expressed in this chapter and to be used to reimburse the General Obligation Bond Expense Revolving Fund pursuant to Section 16724.5 of the Government Code. The bonds shall, when sold, be and constitute a valid and binding obligation of the State of California, and the full faith and credit of the State of California is hereby pledged for the punctual payment of both principal of, and interest on, the bonds as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14066.

The bonds authorized by this chapter shall be prepared, executed, issued, sold, paid, and redeemed as provided in the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), and all of the provisions of that law apply to the bonds and to this chapter and are hereby incorporated in this chapter as though set forth in full in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14067.

(a) Solely for the purpose of authorizing the issuance and sale, pursuant to the State General Obligation Bond Law, of the bonds authorized by this chapter, the Clean Water and Water Reclamation Finance Committee is hereby created. For purposes of this chapter, the Clean Water and Water Reclamation Finance Committee is “the committee” as that term is used in the State General Obligation Bond Law. The committee consists of the Governor, the Controller, the Treasurer, the Director of Finance, and the Executive Director of the State Water Resources Control Board, or their designated representatives. A majority of the committee may act for the committee.

(b) For purposes of the State General Obligation Bond Law, the State Water Resources Control Board is designated the “board.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14068.

Consistent with Section 602 of the federal act, the committee shall determine whether or not it is necessary or desirable to issue bonds authorized pursuant to this chapter in order to carry out the actions specified in Sections 14056, 14057, 14058, 14059, and 14060, and, if so, the amount of bonds to be issued and sold. Successive issues of bonds may be authorized and sold to carry out those actions progressively, and it is not necessary that all of the bonds authorized to be issued be sold at any one time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14069.

There shall be collected each year and in the same manner and at the same time as other state revenue is collected, in addition to the ordinary revenues of the state, a sum in an amount required to pay the principal of, and interest on, the bonds each year, and it is the duty of all officers charged by law with any duty in regard to the collection of the revenue to do and perform each and every act which is necessary to collect that additional sum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14070.

Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, there is hereby appropriated from the General Fund in the State Treasury, for the purposes of this chapter, an amount that will equal the total of the following:

(a) The sum annually necessary to pay the principal of, and interest on, bonds issued and sold pursuant to this chapter, as the principal and interest become due and payable.

(b) The sum which is necessary to carry out the provisions of Section 14071, appropriated without regard to fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14071.

For the purposes of carrying out this chapter, the Director of Finance may authorize the withdrawal from the General Fund of an amount or amounts not to exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which have been authorized by the committee to be sold for the purpose of carrying out this chapter. Any amounts withdrawn shall be deposited in the fund. Any money made available under this section shall be returned to the General Fund plus the interest that the amounts would have earned in the Pooled Money Investment Account from money received from the sale of bonds for the purpose of carrying out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14071.5.

The board may request the Pooled Money Investment Board to make a loan from the Pooled Money Investment Account, in accordance with Section 16312 of the Government Code, for the purposes of carrying out this chapter. The amount of the request shall not exceed the amount of the unsold bonds which the committee has, by resolution, authorized to be sold for the purpose of carrying this chapter. The board shall execute those documents required by the Pooled Money Investment Board to obtain and repay the loan. Any amounts loaned shall be deposited in the fund to be allocated by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14072.

All money deposited in the fund which is derived from premium and accrued interest on bonds sold shall be reserved in the fund and shall be available for transfer to the General Fund as a credit to expenditures for bond interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14073.

The bonds may be refunded in accordance with Article 6 (commencing with Section 16780) of the State General Obligation Bond Law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14074.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter and to the extent permitted by federal and state law, the money in the fund may be used to rebate to the federal government all arbitrage profits required by the Federal Tax Reform Act of 1986 or any amendment thereof or supplement thereto. To the extent that the money in the fund may not be used for that purpose due to restraints of federal or state law, any rebates required shall be paid from the General Fund or other sources as the Legislature may require.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, or rule or regulation, the board may enter into contracts, or procure those services and equipment, which may be necessary to ensure prompt and complete compliance with any provisions relating to the fund imposed by either the Federal Tax Reform Act of 1986 or the federal act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14075.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that, inasmuch as the proceeds from the sale of bonds authorized by this chapter are not “proceeds of taxes” as that term is used in Article XIIIB of the California Constitution, the disbursement of these proceeds is not subject to the limitations imposed by that article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 47, Sec. 2.   Approved in Proposition 83 at the November 8, 1988, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14076.

Notwithstanding Section 14074 or any other provision of this bond act, or of the State General Obligation Bond Law (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 16720) of Part 3 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code), if the Treasurer sells bonds pursuant to this bond act that include a bond counsel opinion to the effect that the interest on the bonds is excluded from gross income for federal tax purposes under designated conditions, the Treasurer may maintain separate accounts for the bond proceeds invested and the investment earnings on those proceeds, and may use or direct the use of those proceeds or earnings to pay any rebate, penalty, or other payment required under federal law, or take any other action with respect to the investment and use of those bond proceeds, as may be required or desirable under federal law in order to maintain the tax-exempt status of those bonds and to obtain any other advantage under federal law on behalf of the funds of this state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 652, Sec. 39.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 22. Graywater Systems [14875. - 14877.3.]

14875.

This chapter applies to the construction, installation, or alteration of graywater systems for subsurface irrigation and other safe uses.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 961, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14875.1.

“Department” means the Department of Water Resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 226, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14876.

“Graywater” means untreated wastewater which has not been contaminated by any toilet discharge, has not been affected by infectious, contaminated, or unhealthy bodily wastes, and which does not present a threat from contamination by unhealthful processing, manufacturing, or operating wastes. Graywater includes wastewater from bathtubs, showers, bathroom washbasins, clothes washing machines, and laundry tubs but does not include wastewater from kitchen sinks or dishwashers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 961, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14877.

“Graywater system” means a system and devices, attached to the plumbing system for the sanitary distribution or use of graywater.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 226, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14877.1.

(a) The department, in consultation with the State Department of Public Health and the Center for Irrigation Technology at California State University, Fresno, shall adopt standards for the installation of graywater systems. In adopting these standards, the department shall consider, among other resources, “Appendix J,” as adopted on September 29, 1992, by the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials, the graywater standard proposed for the latest edition of the Uniform Plumbing Code of the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical Officials, the City of Los Angeles Graywater Pilot Project Final Report issued in November 1992, and the advice of the Center for Irrigation Technology at California State University,
 Fresno, on the installation depth for subsurface drip irrigation systems.

(b) The department shall include among the approved methods of subsurface irrigation, but the approved methods shall not be limited to, drip systems.

(c) The department shall revise its graywater systems standards as needed.

(d) (1) The authority of the department under this chapter to adopt standards for residential buildings shall terminate upon the approval by the California Building Standards Commission of the standards submitted to that commission pursuant to Section 17922.12 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The authority of the department under this chapter to adopt standards for nonresidential occupancies shall terminate upon the adoption of
 standards by the California Building Standards Commission pursuant to Section 18941.8 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 622, Sec. 2.   (SB 518)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

14877.2.

A graywater system may be installed if the city or county having jurisdiction over the installation determines that the system complies with standards adopted by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 961, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14877.3.

(a) Subject to subdivision (b), a city, county, or other local agency may adopt, after a public hearing and enactment of an ordinance or resolution, building standards that are more restrictive than the graywater building standards adopted pursuant to state requirements.

(b) An ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include the local climatic, geological, topographical, or public health conditions that necessitate building standards that are more restrictive than the graywater building standards adopted pursuant to state requirements and shall be limited to the specific area of the city, county, or local agency where the conditions exist.

(c) Prior to commencing the issuance of permits for indoor graywater systems pursuant to state requirements relating to graywater, a city, county, or other local agency shall seek consultation with the local public health department to ensure that local public health concerns are addressed in local standards or ordinances, or in issuing permits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 577, Sec. 2.   (AB 849)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 23. The San Joaquin Valley Drainage Relief Act [14900. - 14920.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [14900. - 14902.]

14900.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the San Joaquin Valley Drainage Relief Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14901.

The Legislature finds and declares as follows:

(a) A report on the San Joaquin Valley Drainage Program entitled, “A Management Plan for Agricultural Subsurface Drainage and Related Problems on the Westside San Joaquin Valley,” has identified 75,000 acres of irrigated agricultural lands that should be retired by the year 2040 primarily due to characteristics of low productivity, poor drainability, and high levels of selenium in shallow groundwater.

(b) Federal, state, and local water organizations and officials should consider the management plan and adopt those parts appropriate for their long-term strategy of contributing to the management or solution of the drainage problems of the west side of the San Joaquin Valley.

(c) The United States Department of the Interior and the State of California should jointly develop a technical assistance program to ameliorate the drainage problems.

(d) The people of the state are concerned with the continued leaching of harmful elements from these lands.

(e) Continued irrigation of these lands could create significant drainage and environmental problems.

(f) Implementing solutions to the drainage and environmental problems associated with these lands will be very costly.

(g) The department is responsible for water planning and development activities throughout the state, has participated in the development of the plan for the management of subsurface drainage problems, and shall take an active leadership role in implementing the plan, including the land retirement element of the plan.

(h) Local agencies have decisionmaking authority, and are subject to court judgments, and statutory and contractual obligations, relating to water use and distribution. The department shall coordinate its activities under this chapter with those local agencies.

(i) The federal government has ongoing statutory and contractual obligations to provide drainage service to the lands within the San Luis Unit of the Central Valley Project. The department shall recognize those obligations and shall coordinate land retirement activities with appropriate federal agencies.

(j) The Department of Fish and Game is responsible for the stewardship of the state’s fish and wildlife resources and the habitat on which they depend, and can offer its considerable expertise to the department on matters relating to the management of lands in accordance with this chapter and shall be consulted concerning the management of the lands acquired pursuant to this chapter and managed as fish and wildlife habitat.

(k) The Department of Conservation is responsible for administering programs to conserve the state’s agricultural lands and has information on the state’s soil and farmlands and shall be consulted for the purpose of identifying agricultural lands that may be acquired pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14901.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that the initial funding for the administrative costs of the San Joaquin Valley Drainage Relief Program be appropriated by the Legislature for the 1993–94 fiscal year from the water quality program component of the Environmental Water Fund.

(b) It is the further intent of the Legislature that, upon full implementation of the program, the program shall become self-supporting.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14902.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the terms used in this chapter have the following meanings:

(a) “Fund” means the San Joaquin Valley Drainage Relief Fund.

(b) “Management plan” or “plan” means the management plan for agricultural subsurface drainage and related problems as described in the final report of the San Joaquin Valley Drainage Program, dated September 1990, described in subdivision (a) of Section 14901.

(c) “Program” means the San Joaquin Valley Drainage Relief Program.

(d) “Retirement land” means the lands recommended for retirement in the management plan, other irrigated agricultural lands characterized by low productivity, poor drainability, and high levels of dissolved selenium in shallow groundwater, or lands that contribute to agricultural subsurface drainage problems.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. The San Joaquin Valley Drainage Relief Program [14903. - 14920.]

14903.

(a) The San Joaquin Valley Drainage Relief Program is hereby established in the department.

(b) The department shall carry out the program and may develop, in consultation with the state board, the Department of Conservation, and the Department of Fish and Game, a land retirement demonstration program.

(c) The department may adopt regulations to carry out the program.

(d) The purpose of the program is to encourage the cessation of irrigation of retirement land and to otherwise assist in the resolution of the agricultural subsurface drainage problems in the San Joaquin Valley through the coordinated efforts of federal, state, and local agencies, nonprofit organizations, and private landowners who elect to participate in the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14904.

The San Joaquin Valley Drainage Relief Fund is hereby created for purposes of the program.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14905.

The department may enter into agreements with the state board, the Department of Fish and Game, the Department of Conservation, possessors of water rights, and other appropriate public agencies and nonprofit organizations to provide for the purchase and management of retirement land and water pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14906.

Property acquired pursuant to this chapter shall be managed as upland habitat, wetlands, riparian habitat, or nonirrigated agricultural land, as appropriate. The department shall coordinate with the Department of Fish and Game to ensure that adequate funding is available for management of the retirement land and use of water for environmental purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14907.

(a) Agreements to sell water that is conserved as a result of the retirement of land pursuant to this chapter to public agencies, nonprofit organizations, investor-owned water utilities, corporations, or persons shall carry out the intent of the Legislature set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14901.5.

(b) (1) Agreements to distribute water that is conserved as a result of the retirement of land pursuant to this chapter shall maximize amounts for environmental purposes, including the restoration and enhancement of riparian habitat, wetlands, fisheries, and instream flows.

(2) It is the intent of the Legislature that water distributed pursuant to paragraph (1) be deemed contributions to a water resources mitigation bank, if established by the state, to meet state or federal requirements to dedicate water for environmental purposes.

(c) Up to one-third of the amount of water conserved as a result of the retirement of land pursuant to this chapter and not sold pursuant to subdivision (a) may be used by local public agencies for environmental purposes, including the restoration and enhancement of riparian habitat, wetlands, fisheries, instream flows, or replenishment of groundwater resources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14907.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the possessor of the water right determines the final disposition of the water.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14907.6.

Participation in the program by local public agencies and landowners is voluntary and shall be undertaken in accordance with applicable statutory and regulatory requirements, court judgments, and contractual obligations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14908.

The funds received from the sale of water pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14907 shall be deposited in the fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, money in the fund is continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal years, to pay for the purchase of the title to, or interests in, the retirement land from landowners who elect to participate in the program, for the management of that land, applicable charges and assessments for water and land, administrative costs, grants and loans made pursuant to Section 14913, and for related water transfer costs.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14909.

The department may apply for, and accept, federal and state grants and receive gifts, donations, and other financial support from public and private sources to be deposited in the fund to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14910.

The department may acquire or accept the gift or dedication of fee title, easements, including conservation easements, leases, development rights, or other interests in retirement lands to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14911.

The department may accept advance payments for future water deliveries undertaken pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14912.

(a) The department may purchase, lease, rent, sell, exchange, or otherwise transfer any land, interest in land or water, or option acquired pursuant to this chapter.

(b) The proceeds from any lease, rental, sale, exchange, or transfer of land or water, or any interest therein, or option, shall be deposited in the fund.

(c) The department, in consultation with appropriate federal, state, and local agencies, shall determine the minimum acreage of contiguous land in which interests are needed to be acquired to carry out the purposes of this chapter with regard to drainage reduction. The determination required by this subdivision is exempt from Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(d) No interest in land is eligible for purchase unless the department determines that the purchase of the interest, by itself or together with other interest in land, is consistent with the minimum acreage determination made pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) The rate of acquisition of title to, and interests in, retirement lands is within the discretion of the department, based on the availability of funds and other appropriate factors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14913.

The department may, by contract or agreement, make grants or loans to local public entities, state agencies, or nonprofit organizations to carry out this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14914.

The purchase price of any interest in land or water acquired pursuant to this chapter may reflect the benefit to the state of alleviating drainage problems in the San Joaquin Valley and the conversion of property to wildlife habitats.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14915.

The price of water conserved and sold pursuant to this chapter shall be determined by the department so as to carry out the intent of the Legislature set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 14901.5.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14916.

Purchase agreements entered into pursuant to this chapter may provide for the return of the property, that is the subject of the purchase, to irrigated agricultural use if affordable technological solutions to the drainage and environmental problems are identified and implemented.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14917.

In carrying out this chapter, the department shall consider the effects of purchases of property pursuant to this chapter on the overall economy of the local communities, including the impact on job opportunities and businesses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14918.

The department shall coordinate with the United States Department of the Interior regarding water distribution undertaken pursuant to this chapter in those areas served by the federal Central Valley Project.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Section operative July 1, 1993, pursuant to Section 14920.)
-------------------------------------------

14920.

This chapter shall become operative on July 1, 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 959, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Note: This section prescribes a delayed operative date (July 1, 1993) for Chapter 23, commencing with Section 14900.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 24. Shellfish Protection Act of 1993 [14950. - 14958.]

14950.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Shellfish Protection Act of 1993.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14951.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Commercial shellfish harvesting is a beneficial use of the waters of the state and, in addition, benefits the economy of the state through the creation of jobs.

(b) Pollution, from both point and nonpoint sources, currently threatens many of the state’s commercial shellfish growing areas.

(c) In order to maintain the health, and encourage the expansion, of commercial shellfish harvesting within the state, it is necessary to protect the commercial shellfish growing areas from ongoing point and nonpoint sources of pollution.

(d) The regional boards whose jurisdictions include commercial shellfish growing areas shall have primary responsibility for the protection of commercial shellfish harvesting from the effects of point and nonpoint pollution sources.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14952.

For the purposes of this chapter, a commercial shellfish growing area is an area certified pursuant to Section 112170 of the Health and Safety Code in which shellfish are grown and harvested.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1023, Sec. 452.   Effective September 29, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14953.

(a) If a commercial shellfish growing area is threatened by point or nonpoint source pollution, as specified in Section 14954, the regional board shall form a technical advisory committee, within 90 days of the effective date of this act, devoted solely to the threatened area. A technical advisory committee shall be formed for any subsequently threatened area within 90 days of the date the threat is identified pursuant to Section 14954. The technical advisory committee shall advise and assist that board in developing a strategy for appropriate investigation and remediation pursuant to Sections 14955 and 14956 to reduce pollution affecting that area. The regional board shall give public notice of the formation of the technical advisory committee. All meetings of the technical advisory committee shall be public.

(b) For the purpose of subdivision (a), the technical advisory committee shall include both of the following:

(1) One commercial shellfish grower from the threatened area, one representative from the State Department of Health Services, one representative from the Department of Fish and Game, one representative from the California Coastal Commission, one representative from each category of potential pollution source, one representative from a local environmental group, and one representative from the local health department.

(2) Additional members and a chairperson appointed by the regional board.

(c) Members of the technical advisory committee established pursuant to subdivision (a) shall not receive a per diem or other compensation, and shall not be reimbursed for any expenses.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14954.

For the purpose of Section 14953, a commercial shellfish growing area is threatened if any of the following applies:

(a) The State Department of Health Services downgrades the classification applicable to the commercial shellfish growing area.

(b) The commercial shellfish growing area is subjected to harvest closure for more than 30 days per calendar year during the previous three years.

(c) The State Department of Health Services classifies the commercial shellfish growing area as restricted.

(d) The regional board, the Department of Fish and Game, or the California Coastal Commission determines that the commercial shellfish growing area is threatened.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14955.

(a) The technical advisory committee shall review existing data to determine whether additional investigatory efforts are needed to identify the pollution sources that threaten the commercial shellfish growing area, the scope of the pollution sources, and the degree to which those sources threaten the commercial shellfish growing area.

(b) If the technical advisory committee determines pursuant to subdivision (a) that additional investigatory efforts are needed, the regional board shall develop, with the assistance of the technical advisory committee, a water quality investigation project for funding under Sections 205 and 319 of the federal Clean Water Act (33 U.S.C. Sec. 1251 et seq.; Secs. 1285 and 1329) or any other appropriate funding sources.

(c) Any water quality investigation project developed pursuant to subdivision (b) shall be limited to accomplishing that which is reasonably necessary for the regional board to gather sufficient data to determine the appropriate remedial actions.

(d) The regional board shall not undertake any investigatory efforts determined to be necessary pursuant to subdivision (a) unless the regional board determines that funding is available to carry out those efforts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1081, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

14956.

(a) Once the nature, sources, scope, and degree of the pollution affecting a commercial shellfish growing area have been determined, the regional board, with the advice of the local technical advisory committee, shall order appropriate remedial action, including the adoption of best management practices, to abate the pollution affecting that area. The regional board shall monitor water quality in the threatened area during the implementation of pollution abatement measures to ensure that the measures are effective and shall provide the results of the monitoring to the technical advisory committee. The regional board shall give public notice of any actions proposed for adoption.
